Missouri, session 2026, SB1367.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 197.062, to read as
follows:
197.062. A hospital with an emergency department shall
have at least one physician on site and on duty who is
responsible for the emergency department at all times the
emergency department is open.
✓